Utah statutes.
31A-30-209.   Appointment of insurance producers to Health Insurance Exchange.

(1)  A producer may be listed on the Health Insurance Exchange as a producer for the defined contribution arrangement market in accordance with Section 63M-1-2504, if the producer is designated as an appointed agent for the defined contribution arrangement market in accordance with Subsection (2).

(2)  A producer whose license under this title authorizes the producer to sell defined contribution arrangement health benefit plans may be appointed to the defined contribution arrangement market on the Health Insurance Exchange by the Insurance Department and may sell any product on the Health Insurance Exchange, if the producer:

(a)  submits an application to the Insurance Department to be appointed as a producer for the defined contribution arrangement market on the Health Insurance Exchange;

(b)  is an appointed agent in accordance with Subsection (3), for products offered in the defined contribution arrangement market of the Health Insurance Exchange, with the carriers that offer a defined contribution arrangement health benefit plan on the Health Insurance Exchange; and

(c)  has completed continuing education for the defined contribution arrangement market that:

(i)  is required by administrative rule adopted by the commissioner; and

(ii)  provides training on premium assistance programs.

(3)  A carrier shall appoint a producer to sell the carrier's products in the defined contribution arrangement market of the Health Insurance Exchange, within 30 days of the notice required in Subsection (3)(b), if:

(a)  the producer is currently appointed by a majority of the carriers in the Health Insurance Exchange to sell products either outside or inside of the Health Insurance Exchange; and

(b)  the producer informs the carrier that the producer is:

(i)  applying to be appointed to the defined contribution arrangement market in the Health Insurance Exchange;

(ii)  appointed by a majority of the carriers in the defined contribution arrangement market in the Health Insurance Exchange;

(iii)  willing to complete training regarding the carrier's products offered on the defined contribution arrangement market in the Health Insurance Exchange; and

(iv)  willing to sign the contracts and business associate's agreements that the carrier requires for appointed producers in the Health Insurance Exchange.

